Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202568-986
Act; federal approvals; department; powers.

(1) On or before January 1, 2026, the department may seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act.

(2) The department may limit the program to those costs that are allowable expenditures under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq., as such act and sections existed on January 1, 2025.

(3) The intergovernmental transfer program authorized in section 68-983 shall be implemented only if and to the extent federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized and any necessary federal approval has been obtained.

(4) To the extent that the chief executive officer of the department determines that the payments made pursuant to section 68-983 do not comply with federal medicaid requirements, the chief executive officer may return or not accept an intergovernmental transfer and may adjust payments as necessary to comply with federal medicaid requirements.

Laws 2017, LB578, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB380, § 4.